Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-111
City council; powers; city property and finances.

The council shall have the care, management and control of the city, its property and finances, and shall have power to pass, amend or repeal any and all ordinances necessary or proper to execute or carry into effect any of the provisions of this act, or any of the powers herein granted, except as otherwise provided herein.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 11, p. 409;

C.S.1922, § 3498;

C.S.1929, § 14-111;

R.S.1943, § 14-111.

"This act", defined, see section 14-101.

An ordinance, providing that it shall be unlawful to erect a gas reservoir without written consent of all property owners within radius of one thousand feet, is void. State ex rel. Omaha Gas Co. v. Withnell, 78 Neb. 33, 110 N.W. 680 (1907).